Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254.09
Boating under influence of alcoholic
liquor or drug; peace officer; preliminary breath test; refusal; violation;
penalty.

Any
peace officer who has been duly authorized to make arrests for violations
of laws of this state or ordinances of any city or village may require any
person who has in his or her actual physical control a motorboat or personal
watercraft under propulsion upon the waters of this state to submit to a preliminary
test of his or her breath for alcohol concentration if the officer has reasonable
grounds to believe that such person is under the influence of alcohol or of
any drug or has committed a violation of section 37-1254.01 or 37-1254.02.
Any person who refuses to submit to such preliminary breath test or whose
preliminary breath test results indicate an alcohol concentration in violation
of section 37-1254.01 shall be placed under arrest. Any person who refuses
to submit to such preliminary breath test shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2011, LB667, § 16.